Massachusetts, session 194th, H3348.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 2 of chapter 6A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “security”, in line 5, the second 
time it appears, the following words:- , structural racism. 
SECTION 2. Said chapter 6A, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by adding the 
following section:- 
Section 105. (a) There shall be an executive office of structural racism. 
(b) The executive office of structural racism shall be under the supervision and control of 
a secretary of structural racism, in this section called the secretary. The secretary shall be 

of 3 9 appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the governor, shall receive such salary as the governor 
determines and shall devote full-time to the duties of the office. 
(c) The secretary shall have all powers necessary or convenient to carry out the duties of 
the office including, but not limited to, the following duties and powers: 
(1) Establish bureaus and other functional units within the office and hire employees; 
(2) Coordinate, analyze, develop, evaluate, recommend and assist in implementing 
strategies and policies for advancing racial equity across state agencies and the office of the 
governor; 
(3) Identify all known laws and rules, including but not limited to: general laws, special 
laws, ordinances, regulations, policies, standards and licensing that have perpetuated the 
structural inequality in the areas of economics, employment, housing, health and education, 
which have had a devastating impact on communities of color in Massachusetts. The office shall 
also investigate whether such rules and laws were crafted with a discriminatory intent to hinder 
the progress of federally protected groups; 
(4) Review the various laws, ordinances policies, rules or regulations that are expected to 
be adopted by the commonwealth and create published findings on whether they will eventually 
perpetuate the structural disadvantages often faced by communities of color before any steps are 
taken in their implementation in the commonwealth. The office shall also monitor ongoing 
policy trends of facially neutral laws that are gravel impacting minority communities; 

of 3 28  (5) Utilize the findings of recent studies that highlight racial disparities to make 
recommendations that would legitimately curtail the discriminatory treatment communities of 
color should have long been protected against; 
(6) Develop yearly findings on the disproportionate impact that incarceration is having on 
low income residents of color in Massachusetts and describe its negative effects, not just on the 
lives of marginalized communities, but on the commonwealth as a whole; 
(7) Identify the behavioral health conditions that develop due to the structural 
disadvantages, which impact people of color in the commonwealth, in addition to this strategize 
ways to make these communities more aware of the distinct behavioral health conditions that 
often come from their experience in the communities; and 
(8) Study and develop published findings on how structural racism has exacerbated 
disproportionate minority contact with the criminal law system in Massachusetts. 
(c) The office shall be provided access to any record of a state agency. The office shall 
not be required to obtain the approval of any state agency in connection with the collection or 
analysis of any such information, nor shall the office be required, prior to publication, to obtain 
the approval of any officer or employee of any executive or state agency with respect to the 
substance of any findings or reports, which the office has prepared under this section. 
(d) The office may adopt and amend rules and regulations for the administration of its 
duties and powers to effectuate this section.